Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0250.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 14n. As used in this section and sections 14o to 14u:
(a) "Affordability program" means the low-income water
residential affordability program created in section 14o.
(b) "Eligible customer" means a residential customer whose
household income does not exceed 200% of the federal poverty
guidelines, as published annually in the Federal Register by the
United States Department of Health and Human Services under its
authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902, who has
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


been issued a waiver under section 14o(13), or who meets any of the
following requirements:
(i) Has received assistance from a state emergency relief
program within the past year.
(ii) Receives food assistance under the federal supplemental
nutrition assistance program administered by this state.
(iii) Receives medical assistance administered under this act.
(iv) Receives assistance under the Michigan energy assistance
program created in section 3 of the Michigan energy assistance act,
2012 PA 615, MCL 400.1233.
(v) Receives assistance under the special supplemental
nutrition program for women, infants, and children.
(vi) Receives supplemental security income.
(vii) Receives assistance under the weatherization assistance
program.
(c) "Fund" means the low-income water residential
affordability fund created in section 14t.
(d) "Funding factor" means the low-income water residential
affordability funding factor described in section 14t(8).
(e) "Nonaffordability application" means a form that triggers
an income eligibility review for the affordability program.
(f) "Program administrator" means the department, provider, or
third-party organization that administers an affordability program.
(g) "Provider" means a public or private community water
supply that provides retail water service in this state or performs
retail billing services for another community water supply.
(h) "Residential customer" means an individual who receives,
or is eligible to receive, water service at the individual's
primary residence.
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


(i) "Retail water customer" means a residential or
nonresidential customer receiving a water bill for water service.
(j) "Task force" means the low-income water residential
affordability program task force created in section 14q.
(k) "Water bill" means a request from a provider to a retail
water customer for payment for water service. Water bill includes a
request for payment of sewer, stormwater, or other related services
if the provider charges for those services.
Sec. 14o. (1) The low-income water residential affordability
program is created in the department to address reduction or
forgiveness of water bill arrearages, to ensure that an eligible
customer's monthly water bill, including discounts provided by the
program or provider, is based on the eligible customer's household
income, and, subject to available funding in the fund, to ensure
that the customer does not pay more than 3% of the eligible
customer's household income on the water bill. The department shall
develop and, in consultation with community action agencies or
relevant third-party organizations, administer the affordability
program for eligible customers.
(2) Not later than January 1, 2026, the department shall
prepare a program policy and procedure manual that is consistent
with applicable provisions in the Michigan energy assistance
program manual and the department's water assistance program
manual, and includes time limits for participation for potential
eligible customers who are not seniors or persons with
disabilities. The department may review and update the program
policy and procedure manual as necessary.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2026, and by each January 1
thereafter, the department and the department of treasury shall
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


prepare projections to determine the estimated funding required to
offer all enrolled and eligible customers and projected eligible
applicants who will enroll in the subsequent fiscal year, with
applicable program benefits. If the projections reflect that the
required funding from the fund will be insufficient, the
department, the department of treasury, and the task force shall
identify alternative funding sources or adjust program benefits in
a manner that prioritizes all enrolled and eligible customers
equitably, across geographic regions and provider population sizes,
to ensure that the affordability program can be sustained through
available funding. The department, in consultation with the
department of treasury and the task force, has final decision-
making authority to ensure program benefits do not exceed the
funding available in the fund. Based on available funding, the
department, the department of treasury, and the task force shall
prioritize program benefits designed to provide eligible customers
with household income-based water bills over other program
benefits. Reducing the affordability program benefits corresponding
with the tier with the lowest household income must only occur if
all other alternatives have been exhausted.
(4) Not later than 18 months after collection for the fund
begins, the department shall implement the affordability program.
When the affordability program is implemented, this section applies
to providers with 500 or more retail water service connections. Not
later than 18 months after the affordability program is implemented
under this subsection, this section applies to all providers in
this state.
(5) Before the affordability program is implemented under
subsection (4), the department shall develop a nonaffordablility
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


application and instructions. The nonaffordablilty application must
be made available when the affordability program is implemented
under subsection (4). The nonaffordablilty application must include
all the following:
(a) The option of authorization for release of the customer's
information to the provider.
(b) The option for indicating consent to receive telephonic
communications about the low-income water residential affordability
program.
(c) An authorization for the release of the customer's
information to the provider.
(d) An authorization for the program administrator to call the
individual on the telephone or send a text message about the
affordability program.
(6) Not later than 30 days after the program administrator
receives a signed nonaffordability application, the program
administrator must complete an income eligibility review to
determine if the individual meets the eligibility requirements for
the affordability program. Not later than 3 business days after the
program administrator starts the eligibility review, the program
administrator shall provide notice to the provider that the
eligibility review was started. The provider shall not pursue
shutoff during an eligibility review. The program administrator
shall promptly send notification to the applicant and the provider
regarding the results of the eligibility review once the
eligibility review is complete.
(7) In addition to any other verification of income accepted
by the program administrator, the program administrator may accept
a federal income tax return or alternative documents as
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


documentation of income. If applicable, the program administrator
must use publicly available information regarding standard benefit
amounts for supplemental security income and temporary assistance
for needy families. An applicant has no obligation to provide
confirmation of the amount of benefits the applicant receives from
supplemental security income. The program administrator shall
consider the customer's enrollment in the low-income home energy
assistance program, the supplemental nutrition assistance program,
the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and
children, supplemental security insurance, the weatherization
assistance program, or the customer's self-verification of income
or lack of income as proof of the customer's eligibility in the
form of a written customer statement regarding the customer's
income or lack of income.
(8) The department may contract or collaborate with a
community action agency or third-party organization that collects
or processes household income information in order to complete the
eligibility review under subsection (6) to determine if an
applicant meets the requirements for the affordability program,
notify the applicant and provider, or perform other functions
necessary to implement the affordability program.
(9) The department, in consultation with the task force, shall
create tiers of eligible customers for the program based on
household income level compared to the federal poverty guidelines,
as published annually in the Federal Register by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services under its authority to
revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902, and the corresponding
discounts, credits, or percentage of household income caps on water
bills for each tier. A provider may use discounts, credits, or
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


other payment methods to result in water bills that meet the
percentage of household income-based payments as required under
this act. The tiers must include the following:
(a) A tier for households where the household income is at or
less than 135% of the federal poverty guidelines, and the
corresponding cap is 2% of household income or there is a
standardized household contribution of 2% of the average household
income for households with income between 0% and 135% of the
federal poverty guidelines within the provider's water service
area.
(b) A tier for households where the household income is
greater than 135% but at or less than 200% of the federal poverty
guidelines and the corresponding cap is 3% of household income or
there is a standardized household contribution of 3% of the average
household income for households with income between 135% and 200%
of the federal poverty guidelines within the provider's water
service area.
(10) Beginning October 1, 2026, and by each October 1
thereafter, the department shall adjust the standardized household
contribution based on the department of treasury's projections,
which must include a projection for not less than a 10% fund
balance to remain at the close of the fiscal year.
(11) If, on the program administrator's determination of an
individual's household income, the program administrator finds that
the individual is an eligible customer, the program administrator
shall provide that information, as well as the eligible customer's
household income, to that eligible customer's provider. On receipt
of the information from the program administrator under this
subsection, the eligible customer's provider shall provide a
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


discount, credit, or another payment method option on the eligible
customer's water bill to ensure that the water bill is based on the
eligible customer's household income. The provider shall not
provide a discount or credit if the eligible customer's pre-
discount or pre-credit bill amount would be lower than the bill
amount after application of the discount or credit. The discount or
credit must apply to the entire water bill, including, but not
limited to, any rider, fee, surcharge, or funding factor. The
discount or credit provided under this subsection must not be
applied to other charges for public services on the eligible
customer's water bill that are unrelated to water, sewer, or
stormwater services.
(12) The program administrator shall inform the applicant of
the determination of whether the applicant is an eligible customer.
If the applicant is an eligible customer, the program administrator
shall provide the applicant with information regarding the
affordability program and how the water bill payment will be
determined by the provider.
(13) Depending on the availability of funds, the program
administrator may issue a waiver to include a household that is
between 200% and 250% of the federal poverty guidelines, as
published annually in the Federal Register by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services under its authority to
revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902, into the affordability
program if the household is experiencing any of the following
financial hardships:
(a) Job loss or reduction of income.
(b) Acute or chronic physical or mental illness.
(c) Increase in essential expenses.
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


(d) Major home repair due to natural disaster or unexpected
catastrophic event or repairs to essential equipment.
(e) Death of a household income provider or unexpected funeral
or burial expenses.
(14) The department shall develop a process and timeline for
redetermination of eligibility for the affordability program based
on the recommendations of the task force and shall consider the
redetermination timelines and processes for similar programs,
including, but not limited to, the supplemental nutrition
assistance program.
(15) The department shall establish or refer applicants or
eligible customers, as applicable, to a system of appeal and
complaint process in which an applicant or eligible customer may
challenge a program administrator's decision on eligibility at any
point or submit a complaint regarding the affordability program.
When an applicant or eligible customer files an appeal, the program
administrator shall notify the provider to place a hold on the
individual's account and cease collection or service disconnection
until the hearing process is complete.
(16) The program administrator shall make a good-faith effort
to assess whether an eligible customer is the property owner and in
need of household plumbing repair to address a leak or other
plumbing or water service issue. If the eligible customer is the
property owner, the program administrator shall coordinate with a
master plumber or journey plumber, as those terms are defined in
article 11 of the skilled trades regulations act, 2016 PA 407, MCL
339.6101 to 339.6133, to fix the eligible customer's water service
issue. The program administrator shall pay for the necessary minor
repair up to $2,500.00 per household. The program administrator
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


shall establish a waiver process to issue over $2,500.00 for minor
repairs if the property owner demonstrates an extreme need.
(17) An eligible customer has a limited allocation of water
use per month to qualify for the tiers under subsection (9). If the
eligible customer exceeds the limited allocation under this
subsection, the provider shall charge the provider's normal rate.
The provider shall determine the limited allocation of water use
per month, but must be within the ranges as follows:
(a) Six to 8 centum cubic feet for households with zero to 4
people.
(b) Nine to 11 centum cubic feet for households with 5 to 6
people.
(c) Twelve to 14 centum cubic feet for households with 7 to 8
people.
(d) Fifteen to 17 centum cubic feet for households with 9 to
10 people.
(e) Eighteen to 20 centum cubic feet for households with 11 or
more people.
(18) A provider shall notify the department or the program
administrator, as applicable, and attempt to contact a customer
that exceeds the limited allocation of water use per month
described under subsection (17) to determine next steps the
eligible customer may take to reduce water consumption, including
possible minor plumbing repairs under to this section, and to
coordinate with the program administrator regarding continued
eligibility in the program.
Sec. 14p. (1) Each provider shall give notice to its customers
regarding the availability of either the department's affordability
program or, if available, the provider's own low-income water
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


affordability program, and information on how to apply for the
programs. The notice required under this subsection must be given
to each customer in writing on or with the customer's water bill
and by posting on the provider's website, if available.
(2) Beginning on the implementation date described in section
14o(4), the department shall engage in public relations activities
to promote the affordability program across this state and must
inform all individuals receiving benefit program services from the
department regarding the availability of the affordability program
and the process to apply for the affordability program.
Sec. 14r. (1) Timely payment, as defined by the provider, of a
water bill satisfies the customer's current water liability so that
there is no addition to that customer's arrears.
(2) A customer who is enrolled in the affordability program
shall receive full forgiveness of an individual's arrears if, on
the date the individual is enrolled in the affordability program,
the individual's arrears are less than or equal to $1,500.00. If,
on the date the individual enrolls in the affordability program,
that individual has arrears more than $1,500.00, that individual
shall receive forgiveness of $1,500.00 of the current arrears.
After 12 months of successful participation in the affordability
program, an individual with over $1,500.00 in original arrearages
on enrollment shall have up to $1,500.00 in additional arrearages
forgiven.
(3) A customer who is enrolled in the affordability program
for 24 months and who has made timely payments on the individual's
water bills for 24 months shall receive forgiveness of the
remainder of the individual's arrears if the arrears were greater
than $1,500.00 when the individual enrolled in the affordability
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


program. The program administrator shall request to the department
that an amount exceeding $1,500.00 be forgiven if the individual
has an extreme need. If the program administrator determines that
the individual has had extreme need or circumstances in the
individual's life that led the individual to not pay every payment
for 24 months, the program administrator may make a determination,
based on best judgment, that the individual should still receive
forgiveness for arrearages.
(4) On enrollment, and while an eligible customer remains
eligible and enrolled in the affordability program, a provider
shall not certify to the property tax authority any amount of
arrears subject to arrearage forgiveness as provided in this
section.
Sec. 14s. (1) A provider may, or 2 or more providers may,
collaborate to design and implement a low-income water
affordability program rather than use the department's
affordability program. A low-income water affordability program
designed and implemented under this subsection must meet the
following criteria:
(a) The low-income water affordability program is designed so
that an eligible customer enrolled in the program will not pay more
than the tiers provided for in section 14o(9). The low-income water
affordability program must also be consistent with the enrollment
process described in section 14o and the arrearage forgiveness
described in section 14r.
(b) The provider considers the customer to be an eligible
customer or a more generous threshold.
(c) Other criteria as determined by the department.
(2) The department or a provider may partner with a community
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


action agency, United Way organization, or other community
organization to implement a low-income water affordability program.
(3) If a provider designs and implements a low-income water
affordability program and the provider already has a similar
affordability or assistance program, the provider does not need to
require a customer who is already enrolled in the existing program
to reapply for a new low-income water affordability program.
(4) A provider that implements a low-income water
affordability program shall submit a plan to the department for
review and approval and receive an approval letter from the
department. The plan must include a description that meets the
minimum criteria provided under subsection (1). The department
shall review plans and provide the provider with any recommended or
required changes. The provider must provide updates to the
department about any substantive change to the low-income water
affordability program after receiving approval under this
subsection.
(5) If a provider develops a low-income water affordability
program that is more generous than the affordability program, the
provider must utilize its own funding or other source of funding
beyond the fund for the more generous program's increased budget.
(6) A provider that designs and implements a low-income water
affordability program may create more than 2 tiers in its tier
system.
(7) If a provider does not design and implement a low-income
water affordability program, the provider must use the
affordability program.
(8) A provider may elect not to collect the funding factor if
1 of the following conditions apply:
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


(a) The provider's governing body adopts a policy to create
and implement its own low-income water affordability program and
affordability fund. Two or more providers may create a combined
low-income water affordability program administered by 1 or more of
the participating providers. The low-income water affordability
program created under this subsection must include a description of
the criteria described under subsection (1) and describe the
providers' ability to maintain a fund to sustain the providers'
low-income water affordability program. Not later than May 1 each
year, the providers shall submit an annual plan for implementing
the low-income water affordability program to the department for
annual review and approval and receive an approval letter. The
department must review the plan and provide the providers with any
recommended or required changes. The providers' annual updates to
the department must identify whether there have been changes to the
low-income water affordability program plan or fund. If the
department determines the providers are unable to administer or
fund a low-income water affordability program created under this
subsection for 2 consecutive years, the department shall notify the
providers that they must enroll eligible customers in the
affordability program and impose a funding factor.
(b) The provider serves a population of 6,000 or fewer retail
water customers, and the provider's governing board adopts a policy
that does not do any of the following:
(i) Shut off water to any retail water customer in the
provider's service area.
(ii) Certify the property tax authority any amount of arrears
for any retail water customer in the provider's service area.
(iii) Pursue debt collection of arrears.
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29


(9) If a provider is subject to a local ordinance that
conflicts with this act, this act supersedes the local ordinance.
Sec. 14u. If an individual submits an application for the
affordability program to the department, or contracted third-party
organization for the department, and the individual is a customer
of a provider that has its own low-income water affordability
program, the department or third-party organization must forward
the application directly to that customer's provider's plan
administrator.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 180 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are
enacted into law:
(a) Senate Bill No. 248.
(b) Senate Bill No. 249.
(c) Senate Bill No. 251.
(d) Senate Bill No. 252.
Final Page
RMH S00914'25 (S-1) hvwq29